Hawaii, session 2025, HB335.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 302A, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to subpart C of part II to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§302A-    Free school lunch pilot program.  (a)  The department shall develop and implement a pilot program that, beginning with the 2025-2026 school year, provides free school lunches to all students enrolled at a department school. (b) The department shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 for the administration and operation of the free school lunch pilot program. (c) The department shall submit an interim report on: (1)  The department's progress in implementing the free school lunch pilot program; (2)  Preliminary results of the free school lunch pilot program; and (3)  The department's findings and recommendations, including any proposed legislation, to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2026. (d) The department shall submit a final report of its findings and recommendations, including any proposed legislation, to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2027.  The report shall include the results of the free school lunch pilot program and a recommendation as to whether the program should be made permanent, with or without modifications. (e) The free school lunch pilot program shall terminate on June 30, 2027." SECTION 2.  Section 302A-404, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "§302A-404  School meals[.]; free school lunch. (a)  School meals shall be made available under the school meals program in every school where the students are required to eat meals at school. (b)  Beginning with the 2025-2026 school year, free school lunch shall be provided to every student enrolled at a department school. Free school lunch shall meet the meal requirements for lunches established pursuant to title 7 Code of Federal Regulations section 210.10. [(b)] (c)  No student shall be denied a meal solely for failure to pay: (1)  Within the first twenty-one days of the first semester of a school year while the student's application for free or reduced lunch is being processed; or (2)  Within seven days after a student's meal fund account reaches a zero or negative balance. [(c)] (d)  The department may adopt rules or policies governing the collection of funds for student meal accounts with a negative fund balance; provided that no rule or policy shall prohibit feeding a student as required pursuant to subsection (b). (e)  It is the intent of this section not to jeopardize the receipt of any federal aid and to the extent, and only to the extent necessary to effectuate this intent, the governor may modify the strict provisions of this section, but shall promptly report any modification with the governor's reasons therefor to the next succeeding session of the legislature for review." SECTION 3.  Section 302A-405, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows: "(a)  [The] Except as provided in section 302A-404(b), the price for school meals shall be set by the department to ensure that moneys received from the sale of the meals shall be not less than one-half of the cost of preparing the meals. The prices for school meals may be adjusted annually based on the previous year's costs rounded to the nearest five cents; provided that the department by rule shall provide a lower rate or free meals to children based on their economic need." SECTION 4. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the school food services branch of the department of education for total plate costs associated with the free school lunch pilot program established by this Act, after federal funding has been accounted. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of education for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 5. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 6. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025, and shall be repealed on June 30, 2027; provided that sections 302A-404 and 302A-405, Hawaii Revised Statutes, shall be reenacted in the form in which they read before the effective date of this Act. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________